Tennessee, session 114, SB1931.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-13-133, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(f) The commission shall notify the chair of the education committee of the
senate and the chair of the committee of the house of representatives having jurisdiction
over education when an opportunity public charter school opens in this state and the
location of the opportunity public charter school.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1931
011951
- 1 -